Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 1. Public Use Areas.
Sec. 41.23.210.
Enforcement authority.

In the Knik River Public Use Area described in AS

41.23.230

, the following persons are peace officers of the state for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of AS

41.23.180

—

41.23.230

and regulations adopted under AS

41.23.180

— 41.23.230:

an employee of the department or other person authorized by the commissioner;

a peace officer, as that term is defined in AS

01.10.060

.

A person designated in (a) of this section may, when enforcing the provisions of AS

41.23.180

—

41.23.230

or a regulation adopted under AS

41.23.180

—

41.23.230

,

execute a warrant or other process issued by an officer or court of competent jurisdiction;

administer or take an oath, affirmation, or affidavit; and

issue a citation or arrest a person who violates a provision of AS 41.23.180 — 41.23.230 or a regulation adopted under AS 41.23.180 — 41.23.230.

A citation issued under (b) of this section must comply with the provisions of AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 2006; am §§ 44, 45 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective July 1, 2010, in (b)(3), added “issue a citation or” preceding “arrest a person”; added (c).

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendment of (b) and enactment of (c) of this section apply “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 41.23.220.
Penalty.

Except for conduct that is a violation of AS

11.46.420

, a person who violates a provision of AS

41.23.180

—

41.23.230

or a regulation adopted under AS

41.23.180

—

41.23.230

is guilty of a violation as defined in AS

11.81.900

.

Except for conduct that is a violation of AS

11.46.420

, the supreme court shall establish by order or rule a schedule of bail amounts for violations under (a) of this section that allow the disposition of a citation without a court appearance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 2006; am § 23 ch 20 SLA 2011)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2011 amendment, effective July 1, 2011, in (a), added “Except for conduct that is a violation of AS

11.46.420

,” and made a related stylistic change; in (b), added “Except for conduct that is a violation of AS

11.46.420

,” and made a related stylistic change.

Sec. 41.23.230.
Knik River Public Use Area.

Subject to valid existing rights, state-owned land and water and the state land and water acquired in the future that lie within the boundaries described in this section are designated as the Knik River Public Use Area, are reserved for all uses compatible with their primary function as public use land, and are assigned to the department for control and management:

Township 15 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 15 North, Range 5 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 15 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 15 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian

Township 16 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian

Township 16 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian

Township 16 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 16 North, Range 5 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 16 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 16 North, Range 7 East, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 4 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 17 North, Range 5 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 17 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian;

Township 18 North, Range 6 East, Seward Meridian.

Section 3:
NW1/4NW1/4

Section 4:
N1/2NE1/4, N1/2NW1/4

Section 5:
N1/2NE1/4, NW1/4

Section 6:
SW1/4SE1/4, N1/2SE1/4, SW1/4, N1/2

Section 7:
SW1/4NW1/4, N1/2NW1/4;

Section 1:
Portions located below the ordinary high water of Knik River

Section 2:
Portions located below the ordinary high water of Knik River

Section 3:
Portions located below the ordinary high water of Knik River;

Sections 1 — 3

Section 4:
Portions located below the ordinary high water of Knik River

Section 5:
Portions located below the ordinary high water of Knik River

Section 6:
Portions located below the ordinary high water of Knik River

Section 9:
Portions located below the ordinary high water of Knik River

Section 10:
Portions located below the ordinary high water of Knik River

Sections 11 — 13

Section 14:
Portions located below the ordinary high water of Knik River

Section 23:
Portions located below the ordinary high water of Knik River

Section 24:
Portions located below the ordinary high water of Knik River;

Section 6:
NW1/4SE1/4, S1/2SE1/4, W1/2

Section 7

Sections 17 — 20

Section 28:
NW1/4SW1/4, S1/2SW1/4

Sections 29 — 32

Section 33:
S1/2NE1/4, SE1/4, W1/2

Section 34:
SE1/4SW1/4, W1/2SW1/4;

Section 36:
Portions located below the ordinary high water of Knik River;

Sections 1 — 5

Sections 9 — 16

Section 17:
S1/2

Sections 20 — 29

Section 31:
NE1/4NE1/4, S1/2NE1/4, SE1/4, SW1/4 located below the ordinary high water of Knik River

Sections 32 — 36;

History.

(§ 1 ch 83 SLA 2006)

Sec. 41.23.240.
Purpose and establishment of the Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area.

The purpose of AS

41.23.240

—

41.23.270

is to protect, maintain, enhance, and perpetuate the present use of the area described in AS

41.23.270

as the Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area. The Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area is established to

protect, maintain, perpetuate, and enhance year-round general public recreation;

protect, maintain, perpetuate, and enhance public enjoyment and use of fish and wildlife;

allow for continued use of the area for grazing and other purposes authorized in a land use plan adopted by the commissioner or by law;

allow additional public uses of the area in a manner compatible with the purposes specified in (1), (2), and (3) of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 53 SLA 2007)

Sec. 41.23.250.
Management.

The commissioner is responsible for the management of the surface and subsurface estate of the Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area. After adequate public hearings, the commissioner may adopt and may revise a management plan for the Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area. The commissioner shall provide a copy of the management plan and each revision to the chairs of the resource committees of the legislature within 30 days after its adoption or revision. The commissioner shall consult with the Department of Fish and Game in the adoption and revision of the management plan.

Subject to valid existing rights, including existing rights for grazing leases and operations and the interagency land management agreement between the department and the Alaska Aerospace Corporation for the Kodiak Launch Complex, the commissioner may not dispose of the surface estate in state land within the Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area.

Grazing and missile launch activity are allowable uses within the Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area. Consistent with the purposes of AS

41.23.240

(1) and (2), the commissioner shall allow additional uses within the Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area, including horseback riding, hiking, picnicking, berry picking, fossil collecting, tide pooling, all terrain and road vehicle driving, bicycling, dog sledding, cross-country skiing, skijoring, snow machining, camping, surfing, beachcombing, and other traditional public uses of fish and wildlife populations such as fishing, hunting, viewing, and photographing of gray whales and waterfowl.

The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land within the boundaries described in AS

41.23.270

but may acquire privately owned land located within the boundaries described in AS

41.23.270

by purchase, exchange, or otherwise for inclusion in the Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area.

The commissioner may not manage the Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area as a unit of the state park system.

History.

(§ 1 ch 53 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2009, under § 2, ch. 60, SLA 2009, in this section “Alaska Aerospace Corporation” was substituted for “Alaska Aerospace Development Corporation”.

Sec. 41.23.260.
Incompatible uses.

Except as provided in this section, the commissioner may prohibit or restrict uses determined to be incompatible with the purposes of the Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area under AS

41.23.240

(1) and (2) within the state-owned land and water described in AS

41.23.270

.

Consistent with AS

41.23.240

—

41.23.270

, the Department of Fish and Game may engage in rehabilitation, enhancement, and development of fish and wildlife habitat within the area described in AS

41.23.270

.

The commissioner may not restrict fishing, hunting, or trapping rights allowed under a regulation of the Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game within the Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area.

The commissioner shall allow access to the Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area by motorized or nonmotorized means of transportation to private land, to interests in private land, and for hunting, fishing, trapping, mining, and recreational purposes in a manner that is compatible with purposes specified in AS

41.23.240

(1) and (2). Existing trails remain open to public use.

The Department of Public Safety and the Department of Fish and Game may have necessary access for fish and game management, research, and enforcement purposes.

If the commissioner determines that a use is incompatible with one or more other uses in a portion of the Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area, the commissioner shall state in the management plan adopted or revised under AS

41.23.250

each determination of incompatibility;

the specific area where the incompatibility is determined to exist;

the time within which the incompatibility is determined to exist; and

the reasons for each determination of incompatibility.

History.

(§ 1 ch 53 SLA 2007)

Sec. 41.23.270.
Description of Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area.

Subject to valid existing rights, the vacant and unappropriated state-owned land, tidelands, and submerged lands and the state land, tidelands, and submerged lands acquired in the future that lie within the boundaries described in this section are designated as the Kodiak Narrow Cape Public Use Area, are reserved for all uses compatible with their primary function as public use land, and are assigned to the department for control and management:

Township 30 South, Range 20 West, Seward Meridian

Township 30 South, Range 18 West, Seward Meridian

Township 30 South, Range 19 West, Seward Meridian

Township 31 South, Range 19 West, Seward Meridian

Township 31 South, Range 20 West, Seward Meridian

Township 32 South, Range 19 West, Seward Meridian

Township 32 South, Range 20 West, Seward Meridian

Section 25

Section 36

Section 19

Sections 30 — 31

Section 15

Sections 19 — 36

Sections 1 — 11

Sections 15 — 22

Sections 27 — 34

Section 1

Section 2: all land lying east of Pasagshak Bay Road

Section 12: E1/2

Section 13

Section 23: SE1/4

Sections 24 — 25

Section 26: Lot 1

Sections 34 — 36

Sections 3 — 6

Sections 8 — 10

Sections 1 — 3

Section 4: SE1/4

Sections 9 — 11

History.

(§ 1 ch 53 SLA 2007)

Sec. 41.23.280.
Purpose of
AS 41.23.280 —
41.23.289.

The purpose of
AS

41.23.280

—

41.23.289

is to protect, maintain, enhance, and perpetuate the present use of the area described in
AS

41.23.286

as the Jonesville Public Use Area. The Jonesville Public Use Area is established to

protect, maintain, perpetuate, and enhance year-round general public recreation;

protect and maintain fish and wildlife habitat so that the public may continue to enjoy traditional uses of the Jonesville Public Use Area;

provide opportunities for the public to enjoy the area through a full spectrum of public uses, including the maintenance and enhancement of off-road vehicle and nonmotorized recreational opportunities for the public; and

allow

continued mineral exploration and development activities;

motorized access to private property, including property in which a person has a subsurface right, in the Jonesville Public Use Area; and

additional public uses of the area determined by the commissioner to be compatible with this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 14 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 14, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on September 5, 2018.

Sec. 41.23.282.
Management.

The commissioner is responsible for the management of the surface and subsurface estate of the Jonesville Public Use Area consistent with the purposes of AS

41.23.280

. After adequate public hearings, the commissioner may designate incompatible uses and shall adopt and may revise a management plan for the Jonesville Public Use Area to the extent workload permits. The management plan must include provisions for the enforcement of the plan and compliance with the requirements of the plan. The commissioner shall consult with the Department of Fish and Game in the adoption and revision of the management plan.

The commissioner of fish and game, the Board of Fisheries, and the Board of Game are responsible for the management of fish and game resources and the public use of fish and wildlife in the Jonesville Public Use Area consistent with the purposes of AS

41.23.280

.

The Jonesville Public Use Area may not be managed as a unit of the state park system.

The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land within the boundaries described in AS

41.23.286

for inclusion in the Jonesville Public Use Area. However, the state may acquire privately owned land located within the boundaries described in AS

41.23.286

by purchase, exchange, or otherwise for inclusion in the Jonesville Public Use Area.

History.

(§ 1 ch 14 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 14, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on September 5, 2018.

Sec. 41.23.284.
Incompatible uses.

Except as provided in this section, the commissioner may prohibit or restrict uses determined to be incompatible with the purposes of the Jonesville Public Use Area under AS

41.23.280

within the state- owned land and water described in AS

41.23.286

.

Nothing in AS

41.23.280

—

41.23.289

prohibits the Department of Fish and Game from engaging in rehabilitation, enhancement, and development of fish and wildlife habitat within an area described in AS

41.23.286

that is consistent with the purposes stated in AS

41.23.280

.

The commissioner may not restrict

lawful fishing, hunting, or trapping rights allowed under a regulation of the Board of Fisheries or the Board of Game within the Jonesville Public Use Area;

the use of weapons, including firearms, in the Jonesville Public Use Area, except in locations where the commissioner determines that the use of weapons constitutes a threat to public safety; or

lawful mineral exploration and development activities within the Jonesville Public Use Area.

The commissioner shall

allow the Jonesville Public Use Area to be used for activities that

are compatible with the reasons for establishing the public use area in AS

41.23.280

; and

include operating all-terrain vehicles on trails or in areas designated or constructed for their use, aircraft, and watercraft; snowmachining, horseback riding, hiking, bicycling, dog sledding, cross- country skiing, skijoring, camping, hunting, fishing, trapping, wildlife viewing, photography, berry picking; and, where permitted, rifle and pistol ranges, parking of vehicles, and lawful mineral exploration and mining; and

recognize the existing off-road motor vehicle trails and the access those trails provide within the Jonesville Public Use Area, make accommodations that will provide the shortest possible route to avoid critical habitat, conduct trail rehabilitation in a way that minimizes damage, maintain and enhance off-road motor vehicle options and opportunities in the Jonesville Public Use Area, and provide for responsible use of the public use area.

The commissioner of public safety and the commissioner of fish and game shall have necessary access to the Jonesville Public Use Area for fish and game management, research, and enforcement purposes.

If the commissioner determines that a use is incompatible with one or more other uses in a portion of the Jonesville Public Use Area, the commissioner shall state in the management plan adopted or revised under AS

41.23.282

each determination of incompatibility;

the specific area where the incompatibility is determined to exist;

the time within which the incompatibility is determined to exist; and

the reasons for the determination of incompatibility.

History.

(§ 1 ch 14 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 14, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on September 5, 2018.

Sec. 41.23.286.
Jonesville Public Use Area.

Subject to valid existing rights, the vacant and unappropriated state-owned land and water and the state land and water acquired in the future that lie within the following boundaries described in this section are designated as the Jonesville Public Use Area, are reserved for all uses compatible with their primary function as public use land, and are assigned to the department for control and management:

Township 19 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian

Township 19 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 2 East, Seward Meridian

Township 20 North, Range 3 East, Seward Meridian

Section 1: That portion easterly of Moose Creek

Section 12: That portion of N1/2, N1/2SW1/4, and N1/2SE1/4 easterly of Moose Creek

Section 13: NE1/4, SE1/4NW1/4, and S1/2

Section 24: All;

Section 2: All

Section 3: All Section 4: All

Section 5: All

Section 6: All

Section 7: All

Section 8: All

Section 9: All

Section 10: All

Section 11: All

Section 14: NE1/4

Section 15: N1/2NE1/4 and the North 960 feet of the East 1,815 feet of the NW1/4 for each Record of Survey filed as 86-85RS P.R.D.

Section 16: All

Section 17: All

Section 18: All

Section 19: NE1/4, E1/2NW1/4, NE1/4SW1/4, NW1/4SE1/4, and Government Lots 1, 2, and 4

Section 20: N1/2NE1/4, N1/2NW1/4, and SW1/4NW1/4;

Section 36: That portion easterly of Moose Creek;

Section 31: All

Section 32: All

Section 33: All

Section 34: All

Section 35: All.

History.

(§ 1 ch 14 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 1,
ch. 14, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on September 5, 2018.

Sec. 41.23.288.
Enforcement authority.

In the Jonesville Public Use Area described in AS

41.23.286

, the following persons are peace officers of the state for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of AS

41.23.280

—

41.23.289

and regulations adopted under AS

41.23.280

—

41.23.289

:

an employee of the department or another person authorized by the commissioner;

a peace officer, as that term is defined in AS

01.10.060

.

A person designated in (a) of this section may, when enforcing the provisions of AS

41.23.280

—

41.23.289

or a regulation adopted under AS

41.23.280

—

41.23.289

,

execute a warrant or other process issued by an officer or court of competent jurisdiction;

administer or take an oath, affirmation, or affidavit; and

issue a citation or arrest a person who violates a provision of AS 41.23.280 — 41.23.289 or a regulation adopted under AS 41.23.280 — 41.23.289.

A citation issued under (b) of this section must comply with the provisions of AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 14 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 14, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on September 5, 2018.

Sec. 41.23.289.
Penalty.

A person who violates a provision of, or regulation adopted under, AS

41.23.280

—

41.23.289

is guilty of a violation as defined in AS

11.81.900

.

The supreme court shall establish by order or rule a schedule of bail amounts for violations under (a) of this section that allow the disposition of a citation without a court appearance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 14 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the obligation of the Alaska Supreme Court to establish bail amounts, see sec. 2, ch. 14, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 14, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on September 5, 2018.